Utah statutes.
53-9-109.   Application for agency license -- Liability insurance -- Workers' compensation.

(1)  Every application for an agency license to engage in the private investigative business shall provide to the bureau:

(a)  the full name and business address of the applicant;

(b) one passport-size color photograph of the applicant;

(c)  the name under which the applicant intends to do business;

(d)  a statement that the applicant intends to engage in the private investigative business;

(e)  a verified statement of the applicant's experience and qualifications as provided in Section 53-9-108; and

(f)  the fee prescribed in Section 53-9-111.

(2)  Before the issuance or renewal of an agency license, the applicant shall provide to the bureau:

(a)  a certificate of liability insurance; and

(b)  a certificate of workers' compensation insurance, if applicable.

(3)  The liability insurance required by this section shall:

(a)  protect against liability to third persons;

(b)  contain a limit of liability in an amount of not less than $500,000;

(c)  be continuous in form and run concurrently with the license period; and

(d)  provide for notice to the bureau in the event of cancellation of the liability insurance.

(4) (a)  The bureau shall cancel a license when it receives notice from the insurer that liability insurance required under Subsection (2) has expired or been canceled.

(b)  The licensee shall be notified by the bureau when a license has been cancelled under this Subsection (4).

(c)  The license may be reinstated when the licensee:

(i)  files proof of liability insurance for the remainder of the license period; and

(ii)  pays the reinstatement fee prescribed in Section 53-9-111.

